Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2760
Departmental actions; costs; liability.

The department is not liable for actual or incidental costs incurred by any person due to departmental actions in enforcing the Scrapie Control and Eradication Act.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 60.